Utah statutes.
30-1-30.   Premarital counseling -- State policy -- Applicability.
It is the policy of the state of Utah to enhance the possibility of couples to
achieve more stable, satisfying and enduring marital and family relationships
by providing opportunities for and encouraging the use of premarital
counseling prior to securing a marriage license by persons under 19 years of
age and by persons who have been previously divorced.
